Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.473

Failure to comply with chapter or rules—Criminal penalties.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell raw milk from a dairy farm that is not licensed as a milk producer or a milk processing plant under this chapter.

(2) The sale of raw milk from a dairy farm that is not licensed as a milk producer and a milk processing plant under this chapter constitutes:

(a) For the first offense, a misdemeanor; and

(b) For the second and subsequent offenses, a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Neither the issuance of a cease and desist order nor payment of a civil penalty relieves the person so selling raw milk from criminal prosecution, but the remedy of a cease and desist order or civil penalty is in addition to any criminal liability.

[ 2006 c 157 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 157: See note following RCW 15.36.012.